Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1711.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-160.05, to read: START_STATUTE15-160.05. Prevention and recognition of inappropriate contact; age-appropriate educational resources; definition A. The state board of education shall: 1. develop a list of recommended resources relating to age-appropriate education on the prevention and recognition of inappropriate forms of contact, including sexual contact. 2. establish a process that allows public schools and members of the public to recommend resources for addition to the list developed pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection. b. The department of education shall POST THE LIST THAT IS DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION a OF THIS SECTION ON THE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE AND SHALL Make at least one resource from the list AVAILABLE TO PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THIS STATE for each age group, as determined by the department after consultation with the state board of education. c. Each public school in this state shall make AVAILABLE to ALL students and students' parents resources relating to age-appropriate education on the prevention and recognition of inappropriate forms of contact, including sexual contact, from the list that is DEVELOPED pursuant to subsection A of this section. d. For the purposes of this SECTION, "age-appropriate" means generally accepted as suitable for children of the same age or maturity level based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacity that is typical for an age or age group.  END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.